Washington statutes.
RCW 11.98.107

Trustee exculpation.

(1) An exculpatory term which was inserted as the result of an abuse of a fiduciary or confidential relationship between the trustor and the trustee is unenforceable.

(2) An exculpatory term drafted or caused to be drafted by the trustee is invalid as an abuse of a fiduciary or confidential relationship unless the trustee proves that the exculpatory term is fair under the circumstances and that its existence and contents were adequately communicated to the trustor.

[ 2011 c 327 s 29.]

NOTES:

Application—Effective date—2011 c 327: See notes following RCW 11.103.020.